Idaho, session 2025, H0173.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-4204, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-4204. CREATION OF COMMISSION -- MEMBERS -- QUALIFICATIONS -- COM-
PENSATION. (1) There is hereby created and established in the department of
self-governing agencies an alfalfa and clover seed commission to be thus
known and designated. The commission shall be composed of six (6) seven (7)
members, including five (5) alfalfa seed or clover seed growers, one (1)
representative from the university of Idaho college of agricultural and life
sciences, and one (1) alfalfa seed or clover seed dealer.
(2) The six (6) five (5) grower members shall be citizens and residents
of the state of Idaho, each of whom is and has been actively engaged in the
growing and producing of alfalfa seed or clover seed within the state of
Idaho, and a substantial portion of whose income has been derived from grow-
ing alfalfa seed or clover seed.
(3) The one (1) dealer member shall be a person who, individually or as
executive officer of a corporation, firm, partnership, association or co-
operative organization, is and has been actively engaged as a dealer in al-
falfa seed or clover seed within the state of Idaho, is a citizen and resident
of this state, and a substantial portion of his income shall have been de-
rived from handling, packing, shipping, buying and selling alfalfa seed or
clover seed, or acting as sales or purchasing agent, broker or factor of al-
falfa seed or clover seed.
(4) The qualifications of members of the commission as herein set forth
must continue during their term of office. Each member of the commission
shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(n), Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 22-4210, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-4210. ASSESSMENT ON ALFALFA SEED AND CLOVER SEED. There is hereby
levied upon on all alfalfa seed and clover seed grown annually in this state,
all alfalfa seed sold as Idaho alfalfa seed and all clover seed sold as Idaho
clover seed, an assessment of one-fourth cent (1/4¢) one cent ($0.01) per


pound of clean seed. All moneys collected hereunder shall be expended to ef-
fectuate the purposes and objects of this act.
SECTION 3. That Section 22-4216, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-4216. INCREASE IN ASSESSMENT. If it appears from an investigation
that the revenue from the assessment levied under this act is inadequate to
accomplish the purposes of this act, the commission shall file with the di-
rector of the department of agriculture a report showing the necessity of the
industry, extent and probable cost of the required research, market promo-
tion and advertising, extent of public convenience, interest and necessity,
and probable revenue from the assessment desired to be levied. It may there-
upon increase the assessment to a sum not to exceed one-half cent (1/2¢) one
cent ($0.01) per pound of clean seed; but no increase shall be made prior to
filing of said report and favorable finding.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.